Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-911
Judges of election; presence; required.

No two judges of election shall be absent at the same time from the room in which the election is held during the hours the polls are open or while the votes are being counted.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 254.